Maine, session 132, LD346.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3737, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Cost differential payment. A provider of child care services under this chapter
may require the recipient of a child care subsidy provided by the department to pay the
difference between the amount of the subsidy provided by the department and the amount
charged by the provider of child care services.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3762, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 29, §§1 and 2, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (9), division (c) to read:
(c) If an ASPIRE-TANF recipient does not respond or notifies the department
of the choice to have the child care assistance paid directly to the child care
provider from the total benefit package, the department shall pay the child care
assistance directly to the designated child care provider for the recipient. The
department shall pay the balance of the total benefit package to the recipient;.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3762, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 29, §§1 and 2, is
amended by enacting a new subparagraph (9), division (d) to read:
(d) An ASPIRE-TANF recipient may be required to pay the difference
between the total benefit package for child care assistance and the amount
charged by a designated child care provider for child care services;
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §3782-A, sub-§5, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. An ASPIRE-TANF program participant may be required to pay the difference
between the total benefit package for child care assistance provided by the department
and the amount charged by a designated child care provider for child care services.